Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,249
Certificate; grounds for discipline.

The director may revoke, suspend, or refuse to grant or renew a certificate issued pursuant to the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act, following opportunity for hearing, upon any reasonable ground, including, but not limited to, the following: (1) The certificate holder has engaged in fraud or deception; (2) the certificate holder has failed to meet the requirements of the act, the Environmental Protection Act, or rules and regulations of the council; (3) the certificate holder is unable to properly perform duties required by the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act; (4) the certificate holder has failed to maintain the minimum requirements of a certificate holder under the act; (5) the certificate holder has failed to demonstrate the required continuing education proficiency under the act; or (6) the certificate holder has failed to perform any other requirements of a certificate holder in accordance with the act or the rules and regulations adopted under the act.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 14.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.